Louisiana, session 2026, HB629.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; "Krewe of Athena"
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Krewe
of Athena" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for such
plate. The plate shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pickup trucks,
recreational vehicles, motorcycles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the Krewe of Athena
Carnival Club, Inc. to select the color and design of the plate, provided it is in
compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include the words "Krewe of
Athena".
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 629 ENROLLED
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to any
citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This royalty
fee shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article
VII, Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana and a handling fee of three dollars
and fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the treasurer of the Krewe of Athena Carnival Club, Inc. The monies received
from the royalty fees shall be used to provide scholarships for debutantes.
F. The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.